District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, that this
act may be cited as the "University of the District of Columbia Multi year Contract No. PO-GF-
2026-C-0019 with Ellucian Company LLC Contract Emergency Act of2026".
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 ( c) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; Pub. L. 93-198; D.C. Official Code 1-204.5 l(c)), and
notwithstanding section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code 2-352.02), and the Council approves the University
of the District of Columbia and Ellucian Company LLC Contract No. PO-GF-2026-C-00 19 in
the amount of $10,157,746.00 to provide for the strategic transition of the University's
Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) infrastructure to a Software as a Service (SaaS)
environment.
Sec. 3. Transmittal. The Council shall transmit a copy of this act, upon its adoption, to the
President of the University of the District of Columbia.

Sec. 4. The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as
the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of
1975, approved October 6, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code §1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer
than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in
section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).